Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,177
Health maintenance organization;
acquisition, merger, and consolidation; procedure.

No person shall (1) make a tender for or a request or
invitation for tenders of, (2) enter into an agreement to exchange securities
for, or (3) acquire in the open market or otherwise any voting security of
a health maintenance organization or enter into any other agreement if, after
the consummation thereof, that person would, directly or indirectly, or by conversion or by exercise
of any right to acquire, be in control of the health maintenance organization,
and no person shall enter into an agreement
to merge or consolidate with or otherwise to acquire control of a health maintenance
organization unless, at the time any offer, request, or invitation is made
or any agreement is entered into or prior to the acquisition of the securities
if no offer or agreement is involved, the person has filed with the director
and has sent to the health maintenance organization information required by
subsection (4) of section 44-2126 and
the offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition has been approved
by the director. Approval by the director shall be governed by the Insurance
Holding Company System Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 86;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 34;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 20.

Insurance Holding Company System Act, see section 44-2120.